Colorado, session 2026A, HB1367.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-4-217 as
follows:
25.5-4-217. Federal reimbursement for public expenditures -
excess to general fund - repeal.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, FOR THE
STATE FISCAL YEAR STARTING JULY 1, 2021, AND ANY SUBSEQUENT FISCAL
YEARS, IF A PROVIDER SUBMITS A CERTIFICATION OF PUBLIC EXPENDITURES
PURSUANT TO 42 CFR 433.51 (b), THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL RETAIN
ANY FEDERAL MONEY PAYABLE AS REIMBURSEMENT FOR THE EXPENDITURE
IN EXCESS OF FIFTY PERCENT OF THE EXPENDITURE AMOUNT; EXCEPT THAT
THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL ONLY RETAIN THE FEDERAL MONEY BASED
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

ON THE DATE OF SERVICE AS LONG AS THE INCREASED REIMBURSEMENTS
AND PAYMENTS MADE PURSUANT TO THE FEDERAL "FAMILIES FIRST
CORONAVIRUS RESPONSE ACT", PUB.L. 116-127 AND THE FEDERAL
"CONSOLIDATED APPROPRIATIONS ACT, 2023", PUB.L. 117-328 ARE STILL
AVAILABLE. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER THE MONEY TO THE
GENERAL FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-75-201 FOR APPROPRIATION TO THE
STATE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(2) THIS SECTION WILL BE REPEALED IF THE RECONCILIATION OF ALL
REIMBURSEMENTS AND PAYMENTS FOR SERVICES DELIVERED DURING THE
PERIOD OF INCREASED REIMBURSEMENT AND PAYMENT DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION IS COMPLETED. THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR
OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN
WRITING OF THE DATE WHEN THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(2) HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. THIS SECTION IS REPEALED,
EFFECTIVE UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE THAT THE COMPLETION
OF THE APPLICABLE RECONCILIATIONS OCCURRED OR, IF THE NOTICE DOES
NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE OF THE NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF
STATUTES.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1367

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1367